Idaho, session 2026, S1273.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 65-201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
65-201. DIVISION OF VETERANS SERVICES -- CREATION OF COMMISSION --
APPOINTMENT OF MEMBERS -- DISCONTINUANCE OF COMMISSION -- RECEIPT OF PROP-
ERTY. (1) There is hereby established in the department of self-governing
agencies the division of veterans services. The division shall be headed by
an administrator who shall be appointed by the governor from a nomination
list of eligible candidates for administrator submitted by the veterans
affairs commission. The administrator may be removed from office by the
governor only with the consent of the veterans affairs commission.
(2) There is hereby created an advisory commission to be known as the
Idaho veterans affairs commission to consist of five (5) persons, all of whom
shall be appointed by the governor of the state of Idaho. Said appointees
shall have had active service in any war or conflict officially engaged in by
the government of the United States and have been honorably discharged from
such service. No more than two (2) of said commission shall be residents of
the same judicial district of the state of Idaho. Upon the expiration of a
member's term, the subsequent appointment shall be made by the governor and
shall be for a term of three (3) years. Such subsequent terms shall expire
on the third Monday in January of the appropriate year. The governor shall
have power to fill any and all vacancies occurring in said commission. The
governor shall have the further full power to discontinue said commission
by proclamation whenever the governor determines that the government of the
United States, or the state of Idaho, shall have made adequate provision for
the care and assistance of honorably discharged and destitute veterans of
the armed forces.
(3) All rights, title and interest in property, real and personal, held
by the department of health and welfare for use in exercising the powers and
duties transferred to the division of veterans services by chapter 59, laws


of 2000, are hereby transferred to and vested in the division of veterans
services.
SECTION 3. That Section 65-210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.